Alaska statutes. Title 18. Health, Safety, Housing, Human Rights, and Public Defender.
Chapter 76. Alaska Avalanche Warning System.

Sec. 18.76.010.
Participation in statewide avalanche warning system.

The Department of Public Safety, acting in cooperation with a municipality or with an agency of the federal government, shall participate in the development and implementation of a statewide avalanche warning system and shall represent the state in the operation of that system.
The statewide system shall

establish and maintain a service center and primary and supplementary field stations to gather information and data concerning ground weather conditions, snow pack, and avalanche activity;

forecast snow avalanche conditions throughout the state;

coordinate a public awareness program on avalanche danger;

catalog a comprehensive atlas of avalanche paths and slide occurrences; and

assist local governments and state agencies in identifying hazardous avalanche zones and in developing snow avalanche zoning regulations.

History.

(§ 1 ch 119 SLA 1980)

Cross references. —

For duties of the Department of Transportation and Public Facilities, see AS

19.05.030

.